North Dakota statutes. TITLE 47 Property
CHAPTER 47-27 Closing Fence Gates

47-27-01.
Fence gates to be closed.

A person who opens a gate or bars in a fence enclosing farm premises shall not leave such gate or bars open unless that person is in lawful possession of the premises.

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 165, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 10088; S.L. 1915, ch. 158, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 10088; R.C. 1943, § 17-0301.

Cross-References.

Fence gates to be closed while hunting, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-23.

47-27-02.
Private road not changed to public road.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall in any way change a private road through enclosed farm premises into a public road, nor take from a person in lawful possession of any premises the right to close any private road through such premises.

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 165, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 10090; R.C. 1943, § 17-0302.

Collateral References.

Right to maintain gate or fence across right of way, 52 A.L.R.3d 9.

47-27-03.
Violations — Penalty.

Anyone who shall violate the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor and, in addition, shall be civilly liable for any damages that may result, directly or indirectly.

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 165, § 4; C.L. 1913, § 10091; S.L. 1941, ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, § 17-0303; S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 21; 1975, ch. 106, § 524.

Cross-References.

Penalty for leaving fence gates open, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-23.